Illinois, session 104th, SB81.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Knight-Silas 5Legacy Act.  6    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 7changing Section 12-3.05 as follows: 8    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)9    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 10    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 11battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the 12discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 13following:14        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 15    or disfigurement.16        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 17    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 18    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 19    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 20    or a bomb or explosive compound.21        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 22    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to   SB0081- 2 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 2    private security officer, correctional institution 3    employee, or Department of Human Services employee 4    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or 5    sexually violent persons:6            (i) performing his or her official duties;7            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 8        official duties; or9            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 10        or her official duties.11        (3.1) Is, at the time of the commission of the 12    offense, 21 years of age or older and causes great bodily 13    harm or permanent disability or disfigurement to an 14    individual whom the person knows to be a Department of 15    Children and Family Services employee:16            (i) performing his or her official duties;17            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 18        official duties; or19            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 20        or her official duties. 21        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 22    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 23    older.24        (5) Strangles another individual. 25    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an 26intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of   SB0081- 3 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 2he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 3means:4        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 5    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 6    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 7    disability; or8        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 9    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 10    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 11    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 12aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 13by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person 14battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public 15place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 16domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 17or other building, structure, or place used for religious 18worship.19    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 20aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 21by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual 22battered to be any of the following:23        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.24        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 25    disability.26        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds   SB0081- 4 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 2    building used for school purposes.3        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 4    fireman, private security officer, correctional 5    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 6    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 7    persons or sexually violent persons:8            (i) performing his or her official duties;9            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 10        official duties; or11            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 12        or her official duties.13        (4.1)(A) A Department of Children and Family Services 14    employee:15            (i) performing his or her official duties;16            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 17        official duties; or18            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 19        or her official duties; and20        (B) the person committing the offense, at the time of 21    the commission of the offense, is 21 years of age or older. 22        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency 23    medical services personnel, or utility worker:24            (i) performing his or her official duties;25            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 26        official duties; or  SB0081- 5 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 2        or her official duties.3        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 4    unit of local government, or a school district, while 5    performing his or her official duties.6        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 7    duties, or a transit passenger.8        (8) A taxi driver on duty.9        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 10    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 11    Code and the person without legal justification by any 12    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.13        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 14    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 15    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 16    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 17    process server.18        (11) A nurse while in the performance of his or her 19    duties as a nurse. 20        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 21    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions 22    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or 23    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines, 24    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 25    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 26    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency   SB0081- 6 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 2    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 3    for a period of 6 months after such declaration. 4    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits 5aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 6knowingly does any of the following:7        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 8    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 9    to another person.10        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 11    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 12    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 13    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 14    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional 15    institution employee, or emergency management worker:16            (i) performing his or her official duties;17            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 18        official duties; or19            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 20        or her official duties.21        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 22    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 23    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 24    services personnel:25            (i) performing his or her official duties;26            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her   SB0081- 7 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1        official duties; or2            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 3        or her official duties.4        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a 5    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 6    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 7    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a 8    school or in any part of a building used for school 9    purposes.10        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 11    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.12        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 13    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 14    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing 15    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 16    private security officer, correctional institution 17    employee or emergency management worker:18            (i) performing his or her official duties;19            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 20        official duties; or21            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 22        or her official duties.23        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 24    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 25    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:26            (i) performing his or her official duties;  SB0081- 8 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 2        official duties; or3            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 4        or her official duties.5        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 6    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 7    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a 8    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is 9    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 10    any part of a building used for school purposes. 11    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 12commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 13or she does any of the following:14        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a 15    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 16    24.8-0.1 of this Code.17        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 18    identity.19        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 20    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 21    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that 22    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 23    another.24        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 25    the intent to disseminate the recording. 26    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits   SB0081- 9 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 2he or she does any of the following:3        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 4    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled 5    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 6    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 7    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled 8    substance.9        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 10    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 11    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 12    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 13    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 14    person any food containing any substance or object 15    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.16        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a 17    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 18    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 19    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 20    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 21    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or 22    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 23    of Human Services.24    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 25battery is a Class 3 felony.26    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4),   SB0081- 10 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1(d)(4), (d)(4.1), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.2    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3), 3(a)(3.1), or (g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.4    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 5Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 6involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 7(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code 8of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme 9physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 10the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 11    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 12Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 13permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 14be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other 15religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 16building, structure, or place used for religious worship. 17    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 18felony if:19        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 20    instrument while committing the offense;21        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent 22    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 23    committing the offense; or24        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 25    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 26    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other   SB0081- 11 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1    state. 2    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 3Class X felony.4    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 5Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 6of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 7years.8    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a 9Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 10of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 11years.12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 13(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 14be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years 15and a maximum of 60 years.16    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6), 17(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 18be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 19and a maximum of 60 years.20    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 21Class X felony, except that:22        (1) if the person committed the offense while armed 23    with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to the term of 24    imprisonment imposed by the court;25        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 26    person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall be   SB0081- 12 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1    added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;2        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 3    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 4    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 5    disfigurement, or death to another person, 25 years or up 6    to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 7    imprisonment imposed by the court.8    (i) Definitions. In this Section:9    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 10the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 11Violence Shelters Act.12    "Department of Children and Family Services employee" 13includes any Department caseworker or investigator employed by 14an agency or organization providing social work, case work, or 15investigative services under a contract with or a grant from 16the Department of Children and Family Services. 17    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 18Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.19    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other 20structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 21or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence 22pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 23Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 24of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 25who is going to or from such a building or other structure.26    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of   SB0081- 13 -LRB104 06408 RLC 16444 b1the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 2include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 3Code. 4    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 524-1 of this Code.6    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 716-0.1 of this Code. 8    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 9breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 10applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 11by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual. 12(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.)